Hawaii statutes.
§571-45 Assessment and investigation prior
to disposition; suspension of delinquency proceedings; denial of services
reporting. (a) Prior to disposition, the court shall conduct a
risk and needs assessment, using the tool procured and validated pursuant to
section 571-5, for each child concerning whom a petition has been filed
pursuant to section 571-11(1) and (2).

(b) In addition to the risk and needs
assessment, a social study and a report in writing shall be made in the case of
a child concerning whom a petition has been filed under section 571‑11(1)
and (2), except where the judge waives the requirement to make a social study
and a report in writing. The study shall be initiated upon the filing of a
petition except in petitions filed under section 571-11(1) when it is
ascertained that the child denies the allegations set forth in the petition.
In such case the study shall proceed only after the court after hearing has
made a finding as to the allegations of the petition.

Except where the requirement is waived by the
judge, social studies shall also be made in proceedings to decide disputed or
undetermined legal custody and in custody disputes arising out of a divorce
action. In all other awards of custody arising out of a divorce action, including
those where an agreement with respect to custody has been made by the parties,
and in any other case or class of cases, the judge may order a social study
when the judge has reason to believe such action is necessary to assure
adequate protection of the child or of any other person involved in the case.
By special order of the judge or by rule of court a social study may be
required in support cases covering financial ability and other matters
pertinent to making an order of support. The use of such studies in custody
and support hearings shall be subject to the applicable provisions of section
571-41.

(c) The results of the risk and needs
assessment and any social studies required by this section shall be presented
to and considered by the judge prior to making disposition pursuant to section
571-41(d).

The judge may order and use a presentence
investigation with respect to any criminal action under the jurisdiction of the
court in accordance with the existing provisions of the law with respect to the
making and use of such studies.

(d) If the results of the risk and needs
assessment indicate a substance abuse or mental health need, the probation
officer shall immediately refer the child to the department of health for an
eligibility determination.

(e) The court, upon the motion of the child or
on its own motion, may order the suspension of the delinquency proceedings,
prior to adjudication, for a period of up to one year to obtain substance abuse
or mental health treatment if the court finds:

(1) The child presently needs and is likely to
benefit from treatment; and

(2) The suspension of the delinquency proceedings
will advance the interests of justice.

No later than one month before the end of the
period of suspension of the delinquency proceedings, the treatment provider
shall submit a report on whether the child has completed the treatment program.

If the court, on the motion of the child or on
its own motion, finds that the child has successfully completed the treatment
program, the court may dismiss the suspended delinquency proceedings. If the
court does not find that the child has satisfactorily completed treatment, the
court may terminate the suspension and proceed with the case.

(f) A probation officer referring a child to
the department of health under this section shall report any subsequent denial
of services to the administrator of the juvenile client services branch in each
judicial circuit. The administrators of the juvenile client services branch
shall submit an annual report compiling all such denials to the board of family
court judges and the Hawaii juvenile justice state advisory council. [L 1965, c
232, pt of §1; Supp, §333-23; HRS §571-45; am L 1971, c 72, §2; am L 1972, c
115, §1; am L 1973, c 211, §1(f); gen ch 1985; am L 2014, c 201, §14]

Note

The 2014 amendment applies to delinquent behavior committed
on or after November 1, 2014. L 2014, c 201, §21(2).

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next